fr: Type de facettes du strass: Taille brillant; Cabochon (dôme lisse); Taille rose; Xilion; Autre
en: Rhinestone facet style: Brilliant cut; Cabochon (smooth dome); Rose cut; Xilion; Other
bg-BG: Стил на фасетите на кристала: Брилянтна шлифовка; Кабошон (гладък купол); Шлифовка тип роза; Xilion; Други
tr: Yapay elmas faset stili: Pırlanta kesim; Kabaşon (pürüzsüz kubbe); Gül kesim; Xilion; Diğer
da: Rhinstensfacetters stil: Brilliantslibning; Cabochon (glat kuppel); Rosenslibning; Xilion; Andet
zh-CN: 水钻切面样式: 明亮式切割; 凸圆形（光滑圆顶）; 玫瑰式切割; Xilion 切割; 其他
fi: Tekojalokiven edustan tyyli: Briljanttihionta; Kabošoni (sileä kupu); Ruusuhionta; Xilion; Muu
ro-RO: Stil de fațetare a strasului: Tăietură briliant; Caboșon (cupolă netedă); Tăietură tip trandafir; Xilion; Altele
hr-HR: Filtri u stilu rhinestona: Briljantni rez; Kabošon (glatka kupola); Ružin rez; Xilion; Ostalo
lt-LT: Akutės briaunų stilius: Briliantinis šlifavimas; Kabašonas (lygus kupolas); Rožės formos šlifavimas; Xilion; Kita
pt-PT: Estilo de faceta do strass: Corte brilhante; Cabochão (cúpula lisa); Corte em rosa; Xilion; Outro
pl: Styl akcentów kryształowych: Szlif brylantowy; Kaboszon (gładka kopułka); Szlif rozetowy; Xilion; Inne
ko: 라인스톤 패싯 방식: 브릴리언트 컷; 카보숑(스무스 돔); 로즈 컷; 크실리온; 기타
cs: Styl broušení kamínků: Briliantový brus; Kabošon (hladká kupole); Růžový brus; Xilion; Jiné
it: Stile di strass a filtro: Taglio brillante; Cabochon (cupola liscia); Taglio a rosa; Xilion; Altro
vi: Kiểu đính đá: Kiểu cắt brilliant; Cabochon (mặt vòm nhẵn); Kiểu cắt hoa hồng; Xilion; Khác
de: Facettenstil des Strasssteins: Brillantschliff; Cabochon (glatte Kuppel); Rosenschliff; Xilion; Sonstiges
nb: Rhinsteinfasettstil: Briljantslipt; Cabochon (glatt kuppel); Roseslipt; Xilion; Annet
pt-BR: Strass estilo de faceta: Corte brilhante; Cabochão (cúpula lisa); Corte rosa; Xilion; Outro
ru: Стиль огранки страза: Бриллиантовая огранка; Кабошон (гладкий купол); Огранка розой; Ксилион; Другое
ja: ラインストーンファセットスタイル: ブリリアントカット; カボション（スムーズドーム）; ローズカット; キシリオン; その他
es: Estilo de facetado de los diamantes de imitación: Corte brillante; Cabujón (cúpula lisa); Corte tipo rosa; Xilion; Otro
sl-SI: Stil brušenja kristalčkov: Briliantni rez; Kabošon (gladka kupola); Rozetni rez; Xilion; Drugo
th: รูปแบบเหลี่ยมมุมของพลอยเทียม: เจียระไนแบบเหลี่ยมเกสร; หลังเบี้ย (โดมเรียบ); เจียระไนแบบกุหลาบ; Xilion; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 水鑽切面樣式: 明亮式切割; 蛋面 (平滑圓頂); 玫瑰切工; Xilion; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl fazety kamienka: Briliantový brus; Kabošon (hladká kupola); Rozetový brus; Xilion; Iné
nl: Strass facetstijl: Briljantslijpsel; Cabochon (gladde koepel); Roosslijpsel; Xilion; Overig
hu: Strasszkő fazettastílusa: Briliánscsiszolású; Kaboson (sima kupolás); Rózsacsizsolású; Xilion; Egyéb
sv: Strassens fasetteringsstil: Briljantslipad; Cabochon (slät kupa); Rosenslipad; Xilion; Annat
el: Στυλ επιφανειακής κοπής στρας: Κοπή μπριγιάν (Brilliant cut); Καμπουσόν (λείος θόλος); Κοπή ροζέτας; Xilion; Άλλο